Idaho, session 2026, S1407.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Division of Occupational and Pro-
fessional Licenses the following amounts to be expended according to the
designated programs and expense classes from the State Regulatory Fund for
the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR FOR
OPERATING CAPITAL
EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
BuildingConstruction&RealEstate $99,500 $310,000 $409,500
Occupational Licenses 15,300 15,300
Health Professions 47,900 0 47,900
TOTAL $162,700 $310,000 $472,700
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.